Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
General Provisions
§ 25-3-11.
Travel and expenses of county attorneys.

In Class 1 counties having two judicial districts and having an area in excess of nine hundred (900) square miles according to the Mississippi Official and Statistical Register issued by the Secretary of State of the State of Mississippi for the year 1952, the board of supervisors is hereby empowered, in its discretion, to provide for and pay the county attorney a sum not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month as a mileage and automobile expense account, said monies to be paid from the general county fund of such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4164.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 191.

§ 25-3-13.
Salaries of supervisors.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

The salaries of the members of the boards of supervisors of the various counties are fixed as full compensation for their services.

The annual salary of each member of the board of supervisors shall be based upon the total assessed valuation of his respective county for the preceding taxable year in the following categories and for the following amounts:

For counties having a total assessed valuation of less than Thirty Million Dollars ($30,000,000.00), a salary of Twenty-nine Thousand Eight Hundred Seventy Dollars ($29,870.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Thirty Million Dollars ($30,000,000.00), but less than Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00), a salary of Thirty-three Thousand Two Hundred Sixty-nine Dollars ($33,269.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00), but less than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00), a salary of Thirty-four Thousand Seven Hundred Eleven Dollars ($34,711.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00), but less than One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00), a salary of Thirty-five Thousand Seven Hundred Forty-one Dollars ($35,741.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00), but less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00), a salary of Forty-one Thousand Six Hundred Twelve Dollars ($41,612.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00), but less than One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00), a salary of Forty-six Thousand Forty-one Dollars ($46,041.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00), but less than Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00), a salary of Forty-seven Thousand Seventy-one Dollars ($47,071.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00) or more, a salary of Forty-eight Thousand One Hundred One Dollars ($48,101.00).

The annual salary established for the members of the board of supervisors shall not be reduced as a result of a reduction in total assessed valuation.

The salary of the members of the board of supervisors shall not be increased under this section until the board of supervisors shall have passed a resolution stating the amount of the increase and spread it on its minutes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4166-01, 4166-02; Laws, 1970, ch. 318, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 457; Laws, 1980, ch. 477; Laws, 1985, ch. 402; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 31, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 550, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 435, Laws, 2006, ch. 435, § 1, eff June 28, 2006 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section); Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 25-3-15.
Additions to assessed valuation for fixing supervisors’ salaries in certain counties.

It is hereby further provided that, in any county of the state having producing oil or gas wells, the total valuation of such oil or gas produced, as reported by the State Tax Commission for the last preceding calendar year, may be combined with the total assessed valuation of said county in computing its category for the purpose of fixing the salary of the members of the board of supervisors of said county; provided that in any county wherein twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the real property of the county is owned by an agency of the federal government, and consequently exempt from ad valorem taxes, the salary of the members of the board of supervisors in each such county shall be that established by the next highest rate from that determined by the total assessed value of the property of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4166-03; Laws, 1970, ch. 318, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 12, eff October 1, 1997.

§ 25-3-17.
Payment of supervisors’ salaries.

The salaries provided in Sections 25-3-13 and 25-3-15 shall be payable monthly on the first day of each calendar month during the calendar year following that in which the total assessed valuation is determined; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month. If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday. The chancery clerk shall draw his warrant on the general fund of the county, the county road and bridge fund, or any fund of the county available for such purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4166-04; Laws, 1970, ch. 318, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 572, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1997).

§ 25-3-19.
Salaries of county auditors.

The chancery clerks, as county auditors, shall receive compensation for their services as such the annual amount of Five Thousand Three Hundred Dollars ($5,300.00), payable in equal monthly installments out of the county treasury; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month. If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6505; 1942, § 4167; Laws, 1928, ch. 87; Laws, 1932, ch. 193; Laws, 1938, Ex ch. 25; Laws, 1940, ch. 255; Laws, 1948, ch. 267; Laws, 1950, ch. 258; Laws, 1952, ch. 218; Laws, 1958, ch. 343; Laws, 1966, ch. 300, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 497, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 535, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 572, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1997).

§ 25-3-21.
Allowance for copying assessment rolls.

The board of supervisors may allow to its clerks reasonable compensation, to be paid out of the county treasury, for making copies of assessment rolls required by law, not to exceed One and One-half Cents (1-1/2¢) for each personal assessment or Three Cents (3¢) for each separate assessment of lands per copy; but the board of supervisors may allow as much as One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) in any case for copying the personal roll, and each copy thereof shall be considered a roll.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6506; 1942, § 4169; Laws, 1924, ch. 206; Laws, 1928, ch. 87; Laws, 1932, ch. 193.

§ 25-3-23.
Deputy chancery clerk in certain counties.

The board of supervisors of any county having two (2) judicial districts and having an assessed valuation of less than Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) for the year 1945, and having a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) based on the federal census of 1940, may, in their discretion, pay a salary not to exceed Twelve Hundred Dollars ($1200.00) per annum to a regular appointed deputy chancery clerk, who shall reside in and serve in the judicial district of the county other than the judicial district of the county in which the chancery clerk resides, provided the chancery clerk’s office in both districts be kept open for official business during the hours required by law.

In counties having two (2) judicial districts, a regular appointed deputy chancery clerk in each judicial district, a total assessed valuation in excess of Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) for the year 1973 and in which Mississippi Highways 8 and 15 intersect, the chancery clerk or deputy clerks designated by him, may be allowed, payable monthly out of the county treasury such sum as the board of supervisors may allow, payable out of the general county fund; provided, the chancery clerk’s office in both judicial districts be kept open for official business during the hours required by law. Provided, further, such amounts as may be allowed by the board of supervisors shall be in addition to all other compensation provided by law.

In counties having two (2) judicial districts, a regular appointed deputy chancery court clerk, a total assessed valuation in excess of Ninety Million Dollars ($90,000,000.00), a total population of more than one hundred nineteen thousand (119,000) according to the federal census for the year 1960, and two (2) cities located within such county, each of which had a population of more than thirty thousand (30,000) according to the federal census for the year 1960, the chancery clerk may be allowed, payable monthly out of the county treasury, such sum as the board of supervisors may allow, but not less than Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) monthly, payable out of the general county fund of such county; and such amounts shall be in addition to all other allowances now provided by law.

In counties having two (2) judicial districts, a regular appointed deputy chancery court clerk, a total population of more than forty-nine thousand (49,000) but less than fifty thousand (50,000) according to the federal census of 1970, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay a salary not to exceed Two Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($2,400.00) per annum to a regular appointed deputy chancery clerk who shall reside in and serve in the judicial district of the county other than the judicial district of the county in which the chancery clerk resides, provided the chancery clerk’s office in both districts be kept open for official business during the hours required by law.

The board of supervisors of any Class 4 county, having two (2) judicial districts, traversed by U.S. Highway 51, wherein Mississippi Highways 7 and 32 intersect, may, in its discretion, pay a salary not to exceed Three Hundred Fifty Dollars ($350.00) monthly to a regular appointed deputy chancery clerk who shall reside and serve in the judicial district of the county other than the judicial district in which the chancery clerk resides, provided the chancery clerk’s office in both districts be kept open for official business during the hours required by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4173-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 286; Laws, 1958, ch. 225; Laws, 1968, ch. 367, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 422, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1974).

§ 25-3-25.
Salaries of sheriffs.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (9), the salaries of sheriffs of the various counties are fixed as full compensation for their services.

The annual salary for each sheriff shall be based upon the total population of his county according to the latest federal decennial census in the following categories and for the following amounts; however, no sheriff shall be paid less than the salary authorized under this section to be paid the sheriff based upon the population of the county according to the most recent federal decennial census:

For counties with a total population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000), a salary of Ninety-nine Thousand Dollars ($99,000.00).

For counties with a total population of more than forty-five thousand (45,000) and not more than one hundred thousand (100,000), a salary of Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00).

For counties with a total population of more than thirty-four thousand (34,000) and not more than forty-five thousand (45,000), a salary of Eighty-five Thousand Dollars ($85,000.00).

For counties with a total population of more than fifteen thousand (15,000) and not more than thirty-four thousand (34,000), a salary of Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00).

For counties with a total population of not more than fifteen thousand (15,000), a salary of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).

In addition to the salary provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Board of Supervisors of Leflore County, in its discretion, may pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). The Legislature finds and declares that the annual supplement authorized by this subsection is justified in such county for the following reasons:

The Mississippi Department of Corrections operates and maintains a restitution center within the county;

The Mississippi Department of Corrections operates and maintains a community work center within the county;

There is a resident circuit court judge in the county whose office is located at the Leflore County Courthouse;

There is a resident chancery court judge in the county whose office is located at the Leflore County Courthouse;

The Magistrate for the Fourth Circuit Court District is located in the county and maintains his office at the Leflore County Courthouse;

The Region VI Mental Health-Mental Retardation Center, which serves a multicounty area, calls upon the sheriff to provide security for out-of-town mental patients, as well as patients from within the county;

The increased activity of the Child Support Division of the Department of Human Services in enforcing in the courts parental obligations has imposed additional duties on the sheriff; and

The dispatchers of the enhanced E-911 system in place in Leflore County have been placed under the direction and control of the sheriff.

In addition to the salary provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Board of Supervisors of Rankin County, in its discretion, may pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). The Legislature finds and declares that the annual supplement authorized by this subsection is justified in such county for the following reasons:

The Mississippi Department of Corrections operates and maintains the Central Mississippi Correctional Facility within the county;

The State Hospital is operated and maintained within the county at Whitfield;

Hudspeth Regional Center, a facility maintained for the care and treatment of persons with an intellectual disability, is located within the county;

The Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers Training Academy is operated and maintained within the county;

The State Fire Academy is operated and maintained within the county;

The Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, ordinarily known as the “Reservoir District,” is located within the county;

The Jackson International Airport is located within the county;

The patrolling of the state properties located within the county has imposed additional duties on the sheriff; and

The sheriff, in addition to providing security to the nearly one hundred thousand (100,000) residents of the county, has the duty to investigate, solve and assist in the prosecution of any misdemeanor or felony committed upon any state property located in Rankin County.

In addition to the salary provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Board of Supervisors of Neshoba County shall pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county an amount equal to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).

In addition to the salary provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Board of Supervisors of Tunica County, in its discretion, may pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county an amount equal to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), payable beginning April 1, 1997.

In addition to the salary provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Board of Supervisors of Hinds County shall pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county in an amount equal to Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00). The Legislature finds and declares that the annual supplement authorized by this subsection is justified in such county for the following reasons:

Hinds County has the greatest population of any county, two hundred fifty-four thousand four hundred forty-one (254,441) by the 1990 census, being almost one hundred thousand (100,000) more than the next most populous county;

Hinds County is home to the State Capitol and the seat of all state government offices;

Hinds County is the third largest county in geographic area, containing eight hundred seventy-five (875) square miles;

Hinds County is comprised of two (2) judicial districts, each having a courthouse and county office buildings;

There are four (4) resident circuit judges, four (4) resident chancery judges, and three (3) resident county judges in Hinds County, the most of any county, with the sheriff acting as chief executive officer and provider of bailiff services for all;

The main offices for the clerk and most of the judges and magistrates for the United States District Court for the Southern District of Mississippi are located within the county;

The state’s only urban university, Jackson State University, is located within the county;

The University of Mississippi Medical Center, combining the medical school, dental school, nursing school and hospital, is located within the county;

Mississippi Veterans Memorial Stadium, the state’s largest sports arena, is located within the county;

The Mississippi State Fairgrounds, including the Coliseum and Trade Mart, are located within the county;

Hinds County has the largest criminal population in the state, such that the Hinds County Sheriff’s Department operates the largest county jail system in the state, housing almost one thousand (1,000) inmates in three (3) separate detention facilities;

The Hinds County Sheriff’s Department handles more mental and drug and alcohol commitment cases than any other sheriff’s department in the state;

The Mississippi Department of Corrections maintains a restitution center within the county;

The Mississippi Department of Corrections regularly houses as many as one hundred (100) state convicts within the Hinds County jail system; and

The Hinds County Sheriff’s Department is regularly asked to provide security services not only at the Fairgrounds and Memorial Stadium, but also for events at the Mississippi Museum of Art and Jackson City Auditorium.

In addition to the salary provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Board of Supervisors of Wilkinson County, in its discretion, may pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). The Legislature finds and declares that the annual supplement authorized by this subsection is justified in such county because the Mississippi Department of Corrections contracts for the private incarceration of state inmates at a private correctional facility within the county.

In addition to the salary provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the Board of Supervisors of Marshall County, in its discretion, may pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). The Legislature finds and declares that the annual supplement authorized by this subsection is justified in such county because the Mississippi Department of Corrections contracts for the private incarceration of state inmates at a private correctional facility within the county.

In addition to the salary provided in subsection (1) of this section, the Board of Supervisors of Greene County, in its discretion, may pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). The Legislature finds and declares that the annual supplement authorized by this subsection is justified in such county for the following reasons:

The Mississippi Department of Corrections operates and maintains the South Mississippi Correctional Facility within the county;

In 1996, additional facilities to house another one thousand four hundred sixteen (1,416) male offenders were constructed at the South Mississippi Correctional Facility within the county; and

The patrolling of the state properties located within the county has imposed additional duties on the sheriff justifying additional compensation.

In addition to the salary provided in subsection (1) of this section, the board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may pay an annual supplement to the sheriff of the county in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). The amount of the supplement shall be spread on the minutes of the board. The annual supplement authorized in this subsection shall not be in addition to the annual supplements authorized in subsections (2) through (9).

The salaries provided in this section shall be payable monthly on the first day of each calendar month by chancery clerk’s warrant drawn on the general fund of the county; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month. If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday.

At least Ten Dollars ($10.00) from each fee collected and deposited into the county’s general fund under the provisions of paragraphs (a), (c) and (g) of subsection (1) of Section 25-7-19 shall be used for the sheriffs’ salaries authorized in Section 25-3-25; as such Ten Dollar ($10.00) amount was authorized during the 2007 Regular Session in Chapter 331, Laws of 2007 for the purpose of providing additional monies to the counties for sheriffs’ salaries.

All sheriffs, each year, shall attend twenty (20) hours of continuing education courses in law enforcement. Such courses shall be approved by the Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officers Standards and Training. Such education courses may be provided by an accredited law enforcement academy or by the Mississippi Sheriffs’ Association.

The Mississippi Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training shall reimburse each county for the expenses incurred by sheriffs and deputy sheriffs for attendance at any approved training programs as required by this subsection.

HISTORY:
Codes 1942, § 4234.5; Laws, 1968, ch 369, § 4; Laws, 1974, ch. 542, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 483; Laws, 1977, ch. 454; Laws, 1980, ch. 529; Laws, 1981, ch. 340, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 496; Laws, 1985, ch. 421; Laws, 1988, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 478, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 5; Laws, 1998, ch. 459, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 3; Laws, 2010, ch. 476, § 6; Laws, 2014, ch. 323, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 25-3-27.
Salaries of deputy sheriffs in counties having two judicial districts.

The board of supervisors of any county having two judicial districts may, in the discretion of said board, pay a salary of not less than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) nor more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to a regularly appointed deputy sheriff, who shall reside in and serve in the judicial district of the county other than the judicial district in which the sheriff of the county resides, provided the sheriff’s office in both districts shall be kept open for official business during the hours required by law.

The board of supervisors of any county having two judicial districts with an assessed valuation of less than Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) shall pay a salary of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Fifteen Hundred Dollars ($1500.00) per annum to a regularly appointed deputy sheriff, who shall reside in and serve in the judicial district of the county other than the judicial district of the county in which the sheriff resides, provided the sheriff’s office in both districts be kept open for official business during the hours required by law.

The board of supervisors of any county having two judicial districts, having a population of less than fifteen thousand (15,000) according to the last federal census, and situated partly inside and partly outside the Yazoo-Mississippi Valley Delta may pay a salary of not less than Two Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($2,400.00) nor more than Five Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($5,400.00) per annum to a regularly appointed deputy sheriff, who shall reside in and serve in the judicial district of the county other than the judicial district of the county in which the sheriff resides, provided the sheriff’s office in both districts be kept open for official business during the hours required by law.

The board of supervisors of any county having an assessed valuation of not exceeding Six Million Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($6,250,000.00) and having situated within its boundaries two federal flood control reservoirs, or parts of said reservoirs, shall pay a salary of Fifteen Hundred Dollars ($1500.00) per annum to a regularly appointed deputy sheriff, who shall reside in and serve in the judicial district of the county other than the judicial district of the county in which the sheriff resides, provided the sheriff’s office in both districts be kept open for official business during the hours required by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6509; 1942, § 4172; Laws, 1928, Ex ch. 82; Laws, 1932, ch. 193; Laws, 1936, ch. 268; Laws, 1938, ch. 308; Laws, 1954, ch. 196; Laws, 1956, ch. 192; Laws, 1962, ch. 387; Laws, 1968, ch. 366, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 417, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1971).

§ 25-3-29.
Method of paying salaries.

Except as otherwise therein provided, the salaries mentioned in the foregoing sections shall be paid monthly out of the general county fund, and the said salaries and allowances shall be included in the budget of each county; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month. If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6510; 1942, § 4174; Laws, 1924, ch. 208; Laws, 1926, ch. 296; Laws, 1997, ch. 572, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1997).

§ 25-3-31.
Salaries of elective state and district officers.

The annual salaries of the following elected state and district officers are fixed as follows:

Governor $122,160.00 Attorney General 108,960.00 Secretary of State 90,000.00 Commissioner of Insurance 90,000.00 State Treasurer 90,000.00 State Auditor of Public Accounts 90,000.00 Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce 90,000.00 Transportation Commissioners 78,000.00 Public Service Commissioners 78,000.00

Click to view

If the person serving as Governor on December 31, 2003, is reelected to the Office of Governor for the term beginning in the year 2004, he may choose not to receive the salary increase authorized by this section, but to receive, instead, an annual salary of One Hundred One Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($101,800.00) during his new term of office by filing a written request with the Department of Finance and Administration.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6511; 1942, § 4175; Laws, 1922, ch. 159; Laws, 1932, ch. 132; Laws, 1938, chs. 152, 153, 154, 156; Laws, 1942, chs. 275, 321; Laws, 1944, chs. 265, 317-319; Laws, 1946, chs. 275, 278, 293, 458; Laws, 1948, chs. 188, 201, 221, 223; Laws, 1950, chs. 199, 343, 443, 466; Laws, 1952, chs. 178, 229, 245, 315, 325, 335; Laws, 1954, chs. 212, 253; Laws, 1954, Ex ch. 16, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1956, ch. 358, § 2; Laws, 1958 chs. 325, 328, 334, 337, 338, 344, 345, 354; Laws, 1960, chs. 324, 332, 333, 334, 335, 336; Laws, 1962, ch. 388, § 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 1, 1970, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 545, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 453, § 6; Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 528, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 481, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 577, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 548, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 25-3-32.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 577, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

[Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1978]

§ 25-3-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 563, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

[Codes, 1942, § 4175.1; Laws, 1970, ch. 402, § 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 545, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 512, § 4; Laws, 1980, ch. 496, § 12, ch. 475, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 536, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 514; Laws, 1988, ch. 528, § 3; Laws, 1989, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 3, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 587, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 577, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 581, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 550, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.]

§ 25-3-34.
Education benchmarks for appointive state and district officials.

In addition to the salary provided in Section 25-3-33, any appointive state and district official and employee provided therein shall receive the award of an education benchmark as defined in State Personnel Board rules for the possession or attainment of any of the following:

The Certified Public Manager designation;

A job-related Ph.D (Doctor of Philosophy) degree which is not required as a minimum qualification of the position;

A job related certification, licensure, or registration requiring the passage of an examination, which is not required as a minimum qualification of the position.

No such official or employee may receive more than a total of three (3) eligible benchmarks, only one of which may be for a job related certification, licensure or registration.

The State Personnel Board shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 478, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 25-3-35.
Salaries of elected judiciary, district attorneys and legal assistants.

The annual salaries of the following judges are fixed as follows:

Click to view

There are imposed upon the Supreme Court justices the extra duties of taking all necessary action to promote judicial education in schools, intervention courts, electronic filing and case management systems as developed by the Administrative Office of Courts, or such other additional duties as may be assigned by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court. For such extra services each justice, from and after January 1, 2013, shall receive a sum sufficient to aggregate, per annum, the salaries set forth in this subsection (1).

The fixed salaries in this subsection (1) shall be paid from the State General Fund and from the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45. No less than: One Hundred Fifteen Thousand Three Hundred Ninety Dollars ($115,390.00) of the Chief Justice’s salary in this subsection (1), One Hundred Thirteen Thousand One Hundred Ninety Dollars ($113,190.00) of the salary of a presiding justice in this subsection (1), and One Hundred Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Thirty Dollars ($112,530.00) of the salary of an associate justice in this subsection (1) shall be paid from general fund monies; in addition, the Legislature shall appropriate annually from the Judicial System Operation Fund a sum sufficient to increase the salary of the Chief Justice, a presiding justice and an associate justice to the levels set forth in this subsection (1).

The fixed salaries as specified in this subsection (1) shall be the exclusive and total compensation which can be reported to the Public Employees’ Retirement System for retirement purposes; however, any judge in office on December 31, 2003, may continue to report his expense allowance as part of his compensation for retirement purposes.

The annual salaries of the judges of the Court of Appeals of Mississippi are fixed as follows:

Click to view

From and after January 1, 2013, each judge shall receive a sum sufficient to aggregate, per annum, the salaries set forth in this subsection (2).

The fixed salaries in this subsection (2) shall be paid from the State General Fund and from the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45. No less than One Hundred Eight Thousand One Hundred Thirty Dollars ($108,130.00) of the Chief Judge’s salary in this subsection (2) shall be paid from General Fund monies; in addition, the Legislature shall appropriate annually from the Judicial System Operation Fund a sum sufficient to increase the Chief Judge’s salary to the level set forth in this subsection (2). No less than One Hundred Five Thousand Fifty Dollars ($105,050.00) of the salary of an Associate Judge in this subsection (2) shall be paid from General Fund monies; in addition, the Legislature shall appropriate annually from the Judicial System Operation Fund a sum sufficient to increase the salary of an Associate Judge to the level set forth in this subsection (2).

The fixed salaries as specified in this subsection (2) shall be the exclusive and total compensation which can be reported to the Public Employees’ Retirement System for retirement purposes; however, any judge in office on December 31, 2003, may continue to report his expense allowance as part of his compensation for retirement purposes.

The annual salaries of the chancery and circuit court judges are fixed as follows:

Click to view

In addition to their present official duties, the circuit and chancery judges shall take necessary action to promote judicial education in schools, intervention courts, electronic filing and case management systems as developed by the Administrative Office of Courts, or such other additional duties as may be assigned by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court. For such extra services each judge, from and after January 1, 2013, shall receive a sum sufficient to aggregate, per annum, the salaries set forth in this subsection (3).

The fixed salaries in this subsection (3) shall be paid from the State General Fund and from the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45. No less than One Hundred Four Thousand One Hundred Seventy Dollars ($104,170.00) of the salary of a Chancery or Circuit Judge in this subsection (3) shall be paid from General Fund monies; in addition, the Legislature shall appropriate annually from the Judicial System Operation Fund a sum sufficient to increase the salary of a Chancery or Circuit Judge to the levels set forth in this subsection (3).

From and after January 1, 2019, and every four (4) years thereafter, the annual salaries of the judges in subsections (1), (2) and (3) shall be fixed at the level of compensation recommended by the State Personnel Board according to the board’s most recent report on judicial salaries, as required under Section 25-9-115, to the extent that sufficient funds are available. The annual salaries fixed in accordance with this subsection (4) shall not become effective until the commencement of the next immediately succeeding term of office.

The Supreme Court shall prepare a payroll for chancery judges and circuit judges and submit such payroll to the Department of Finance and Administration.

The annual salary of the full-time district attorneys shall be:

From and after January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2013:

One Hundred Three Thousand Three Hundred Twenty-two Dollars ($103,322.00).

From and after January 1, 2014, through December 31, 2014:

One Hundred Ten Thousand Eight Hundred Forty-eight Dollars ($110,848.00).

From and after January 1, 2015, through December 31, 2015:

One Hundred Eighteen Thousand Three Hundred Seventy-four Dollars ($118,374.00).

From and after January 1, 2016:

One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Nine Hundred Dollars ($125,900.00).

The annual salary of the full-time legal assistants shall be not less than Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) nor more than eighty percent (80%) of the salary of the district attorney for legal assistants who have been licensed to practice law for five (5) years or less; eighty-five percent (85%) of the salary of the district attorney for legal assistants who have been licensed to practice law for at least five (5) years but less than fifteen (15) years; and ninety percent (90%) of the salary of the district attorney for legal assistants who have been licensed to practice law for at least fifteen (15) years or more.

From and after January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2013: Chief Justice of the Supreme Court $ 126,292.50 Presiding Justices of the Supreme Court, each 123,600.75 Associate Justices of the Supreme Court, each 122,460.00 From and after January 1, 2014, through December 31, 2014: Chief Justice of the Supreme Court $137,195.00 Presiding Justices of the Supreme Court, each 134,011.50 Associate Justices of the Supreme Court, each 132,390.00 From and after January 1, 2015, through December 31, 2015: Chief Justice of the Supreme Court $148,097.50 Presiding Justices of the Supreme Court, each 144,422.25 Associate Justices of the Supreme Court, each 142,320.00 From and after January 1, 2016: Chief Justice of the Supreme Court $159,000.00 Presiding Justices of the Supreme Court, each 154,833.00 Associate Justices of the Supreme Court, each 152,250.00

From and after January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2013: Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals $ 117,992.00 Associate Judges of the Court of Appeals, each 114,994.25 From and after January 1, 2014, through December 31, 2014: Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals $127,854.00 Associate Judges of the Court of Appeals, each 124,938.50 From and after January 1, 2015, through December 31, 2015: Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals $137,716.00 Associate Judges of the Court of Appeals, each. 134,882.75 From and after January 1, 2016: Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals $147,578.00 Associate Judges of the Court of Appeals, each 144,827.00

From and after January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2013: Chancery Judges, each $ 112,127.50 Circuit Judges, each 112,127.50 From and after January 1, 2014, through December 31, 2014: Chancery Judges, each $120,085.00 Circuit Judges, each 120,085.00 From and after January 1, 2015, through December 31, 2015: Chancery Judges, each $128,042.50 Circuit Judges, each 128,042.50 From and after January 1, 2016: Chancery Judges, each $136,000.00 Circuit Judges, each 136,000.00

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4175.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 402, § 3; Laws, 1974, ch. 351; Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 536, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 528, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 373, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 481, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 32; Laws, 1997, ch. 577, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 581, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 563, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 548, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 548, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 329, § 1, eff January 1, 2013 (the later of the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section, or January 1, 2013); Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2019.